Wisconsin, session 2025, AB302.
do enact as follows:AB302,13Section 1. 347.25 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB302,1,74347.25 (3) The lead vehicle in a funeral procession may be equipped, or any 5vehicle in the procession may be equipped if all vehicles in the procession are so 6equipped, with a flashing amber or purple light that may be used only in the 7procession.AB302,1,88